Washington statutes.
RCW 7.06.020

Actions subject to civil arbitration—Court may authorize mandatory arbitration of maintenance and child support.

(1) All civil actions, except for appeals from municipal or district courts, which are at issue in the superior court in counties which have authorized arbitration, where the sole relief sought is a money judgment, and where no party asserts a claim in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, or if approved by the superior court of a county by two-thirds or greater vote of the judges thereof, up to one hundred thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs, are subject to civil arbitration.

(2) If approved by majority vote of the superior court judges of a county which has authorized arbitration, all civil actions which are at issue in the superior court in which the sole relief sought is the establishment, termination, or modification of maintenance or child support payments are subject to mandatory arbitration. The arbitrability of any such action shall not be affected by the amount or number of payments involved.

[ 2018 c 36 s 2; 2005 c 472 s 2. Prior: 1987 c 212 s 101; 1987 c 202 s 127; 1985 c 265 s 3; 1982 c 188 s 1; 1979 c 103 s 2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: MAR 1.2.

Applicability—Effective date—2018 c 36: See notes following RCW 7.06.043.

Application—2005 c 472 s 2: "Section 2 of this act applies to any case in which a notice of arbitrability is filed on or after July 24, 2005." [ 2005 c 472 s 3.]

Effective date—1987 c 212 ss 101 and 102: "Sections 101 and 102 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1987 c 212 s 1902.]

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.